Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2802
Terms, defined; common-law meaning; when.

(1) As used in the Nebraska Hospital-Medical Liability Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in sections 44-2803 to 44-2817 shall apply.

(2) Any legal word or term of art used in the Nebraska Hospital-Medical Liability Act and not otherwise defined shall have such meaning as is consistent with common law.

Laws 1976, LB 434, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 692, § 3.